Illinois, session 104th, SB1844.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-5.12f as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-5.12f)7    Sec. 5-5.12f. Prescription drugs for mental illness; no 8utilization or prior approval mandates. 9    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code to 10the contrary, except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), 11for the purpose of removing barriers to the timely treatment 12of serious mental illnesses, prior authorization mandates and 13utilization management controls shall not be imposed under the 14fee-for-service and managed care medical assistance programs 15on any FDA-approved prescription drug that is recognized by a 16generally accepted standard medical reference as effective in 17the treatment of conditions specified in the most recent 18Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders 19published by the American Psychiatric Association if a 20preferred or non-preferred drug is prescribed to an adult 21patient to treat serious mental illness and one of the 22following applies:23        (1) the patient has changed providers, including, but   SB1844- 2 -LRB104 10157 KTG 20229 b1    not limited to, a change from an inpatient to an 2    outpatient provider, and is stable on the drug that has 3    been previously prescribed, and received prior 4    authorization, if required;5        (2) the patient has changed insurance coverage and is 6    stable on the drug that has been previously prescribed and 7    received prior authorization under the previous source of 8    coverage; or9        (3) subject to federal law on maximum dosage limits 10    and safety edits adopted by the Department's Drug and 11    Therapeutics Board, including those safety edits and 12    limits needed to comply with federal requirements 13    contained in 42 CFR 456.703, the patient has previously 14    been prescribed and obtained prior authorization for the 15    drug and the prescription modifies the dosage, dosage 16    frequency, or both, of the drug as part of the same 17    treatment for which the drug was previously prescribed. 18    (b) The following safety edits shall be permitted for 19prescription drugs covered under this Section:20        (1) clinically appropriate drug utilization review 21    (DUR) edits, including, but not limited to, drug-to-drug, 22    drug-age, and drug-dose;23        (2) generic drug substitution if a generic drug is 24    available for the prescribed medication in the same dosage 25    and formulation; and26        (3) any utilization management control that is   SB1844- 3 -LRB104 10157 KTG 20229 b1    necessary for the Department to comply with any current 2    consent decrees or federal waivers. 3    (c) As used in this Section, "serious mental illness" 4means any one or more of the following diagnoses and 5International Classification of Diseases, Tenth Revision, 6Clinical Modification (ICD-10-CM) codes listed by the 7Department of Human Services' Division of Mental Health, as 8amended, on its official website: 9        (1) Delusional Disorder (F22)10        (2) Brief Psychotic Disorder (F23)11        (3) Schizophreniform Disorder (F20.81)12        (4) Schizophrenia (F20.9)13        (5) Schizoaffective Disorder (F25.x)14        (6) Catatonia Associated with Another Mental Disorder 15    (Catatonia Specifier) (F06.1)16        (7) Other Specified Schizophrenia Spectrum and Other 17    Psychotic Disorder (F28)18        (8) Unspecified Schizophrenia Spectrum and Other 19    Psychotic Disorder (F29)20        (9) Bipolar I Disorder (F31.xx)21        (10) Bipolar II Disorder (F31.81)22        (11) Cyclothymic Disorder (F34.0)23        (12) Unspecified Bipolar and Related Disorder (F31.9)24        (13) Disruptive Mood Dysregulation Disorder (F34.8)25        (14) Major Depressive Disorder Single episode (F32.xx)26        (15) Major Depressive Disorder, Recurrent episode   SB1844- 4 -LRB104 10157 KTG 20229 b1    (F33.xx)2        (16) Obsessive-Compulsive Disorder (F42)3        (17) Posttraumatic Stress Disorder (F43.10)4        (18) Anorexia Nervosa (F50.0x)5        (19) Bulimia Nervosa (F50.2)6        (20) Postpartum Depression (F53.0)7        (21) Puerperal Psychosis (F53.1)8        (22) Factitious Disorder Imposed on Another (F68.A)9    (d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, nothing in 10this Section shall not be construed to conflict with Section 111927(a)(1) and (b)(1)(A) of the federal Social Security Act 12and any implementing regulations and agreements. 13    (e) The Department and all managed care organizations are 14required to report quarterly on compliance with the conditions 15of this Section beginning with dates of service on and after 16July 1, 2025. Reports are due 60 calendar days after the end of 17the quarter to be reported. For example, for dates of services 18occurring in the quarter ending September 30, 2025, reports 19are due November 29, 2025. The Department may delay the due 20date until the next business day if it falls on a 21State-recognized holiday or a weekend. The Department must 22post on its website a report on fee-for-service prescriptions 23and the reports from each managed care organization. For all 24prescription drugs described in subsection (a), the following 25information must be reported:26        (1) The number of denied prescriptions and estimated   SB1844- 5 -LRB104 10157 KTG 20229 b1    net cost to the State for those prescriptions summarized 2    by each of the allowed categories specified in subsection 3    (b). This paragraph shall include the number of prior 4    authorization denials and step therapy exception requests.5        (2) The number of denied prescriptions and estimated 6    net cost to the State for those prescriptions summarized 7    by each of the non-allowed categories specified in 8    subsection (a). This paragraph shall include the number of 9    prior authorization denials and step therapy exception 10    requests.11        (3) The number of denied prescriptions and estimated 12    gross cost to the State for those prescriptions summarized 13    by any other reason not specified in subsection (a) or 14    (b). This paragraph shall include the number of prior 15    authorization denials, step therapy exception requests, 16    number of step edits for each medication, and any rebate 17    revenue associated with those prescriptions.18        (4) The number of approved and paid prescriptions and 19    net cost to the State for those prescriptions summarized 20    by any other reason not specified in subsection (a) or 21    (b). This paragraph shall include the number of prior 22    authorization denials, step therapy exception requests, 23    number of step edits for each medication, and any rebate 24    revenue associated with those prescriptions.25        (5) The number of complaints filed concerning denials 26    for prescriptions which meet the conditions specified in   SB1844- 6 -LRB104 10157 KTG 20229 b1    subsection (a). This paragraph shall include the number of 2    prior authorization denials and step therapy exception 3    requests.4        (6) The number of people using emergency room services 5    based on categories specified in subsection (c).6        (7) The number of people who are admitted into the 7    hospital and hospital readmissions (7 or 30 days post 8    release) based on categories specified in subsection (c) 9    and the cost of care while receiving treatment.10    The Department shall sanction managed care organizations 11that do not file reports mandated by this subsection.12(Source: P.A. 103-593, eff. 6-7-24.) 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.